Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-520
Clerk magistrates; assignment; written orders.

All assignments of matters to clerk magistrates shall be by written order signed by the presiding county judge and filed with the clerk. No order or judgment shall be void or subject to collateral attack solely because it was rendered pursuant to improper assignment to a clerk magistrate.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 20;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 9.